California statutes. Education Code
(a) “Cardcheck agreement” means a written agreement between an employer and a labor organization providing a procedure for determining employee preference on the subject of whether to be represented by a labor organization for collective bargaining, and if so, by which labor organization to be represented, that provides, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The determination of employee preference regarding union representation shall be by a cardcheck procedure conducted by a neutral third party in lieu of a formal election.

(2) All disputes over interpretation or application of the parties’ cardcheck agreement, and over issues regarding how to carry out the cardcheck process or specific cardcheck procedures shall be submitted to binding arbitration.

(3) The forbearance by any labor organization from economic action against the employer at the worksite of an organizing drive covered by this section, and in relation to an organizing campaign only (not to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement), so long as the employer complies with the terms of the cardcheck agreement.

(4) Language and procedures prohibiting the labor organization or the employer from coercing or intimidating employees, explicitly or implicitly, in selecting or not selecting a bargaining representative.

(b) “Collective bargaining agreement” means an agreement between an employer and a labor organization regarding wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment of the employer’s employees. For purposes of this article, a collective bargaining agreement does not include a cardcheck agreement as defined in subdivision (a).

(c) “Facility” means any campus, school, cafeteria, store, hospital, clinic, institute, laboratory, or office owned or operated by the university, or at which the normal educational or administrative functions of the university are conducted.

(d) “Labor organization” means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions or work.

(e) “Proprietary interest” means any nonregulatory arrangement or circumstances in which the financial or other nonregulatory interests of the university in a service contract could be adversely affected by labor-management conflict or consumer boycotts potentially resulting from a union organizing campaign.

(f) “Service contract” means a lease, management agreement, service agreement, loan bond, guarantee, or other similar agreement to which the university is a party and in which the university has a proprietary interest.

(g) “Service contractor” means an individual, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, or other entity, other than a collection agency retained by the university to enforce a financial obligation owed to the university, that, pursuant to a service contract, provides goods or services to the university.

(h) “University” means the University of California and its governing body, the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

92625.3.

(a) A service contractor shall enter into and comply with a cardcheck agreement, as defined in Section 92625.1, with any labor organization that requests the agreement for the purpose of seeking to represent the service contractor’s employees performing services covered by the service contract. If a service contractor enters into a cardcheck agreement with a labor organization, it shall offer that same agreement to any other labor organization seeking to represent the service contractor’s employees. Any labor organization that was not a party to the initial cardcheck agreement may, in its discretion, reject the terms negotiated by the first union, and negotiate for a different cardcheck agreement. In the event that a labor organization and the service contractor are unable to negotiate an agreement within the 30-day period, this section shall apply.

(b) The university shall include in any service contract a provision requiring any service contractor to abide by the requirements imposed under subdivision (a) as essential consideration for the university entering into the service contract.

(c) All requests for proposals or invitations to bid or similar documents regarding service contracts shall include a summary description of, and reference to, the policy and requirements of this article. Failure to include the description or reference to this article in a document may not exempt any service contractor otherwise subject to the requirements of this article.

(d) This article may not apply to any service contractor signatory to a valid and binding collective bargaining agreement covering the terms and conditions of employment for its employees performing services subject to the service contract, which includes a no-strike provision, and which extends at least through the term of the service contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

92625.5.

The university or any other interested party may bring an action for an injunction or specific performance in order to secure compliance with the requirements of this article. The university shall also have the right to terminate the service contract, upon 30 days’ written notice to the service contractor, to cure its breach, where the service contractor has failed to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

92625.7.

If any provision of this article is declared illegal, invalid, or inoperative, in whole or in part, by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining provisions and portions thereof and applications not declared illegal, invalid, or inoperative shall remain in full force or effect. Nothing in this article may be construed to impair any contractual obligations of the university. This article may not be applied to the extent it will cause the loss of any federal or state funding of university activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

92625.9.

This article shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Alumni [92630. - 92630.5.]

92630.

(a) The regents and alumni associations may distribute the names, addresses, and email addresses of alumni of the University of California to a business as described in subdivision (b) in order to accomplish any or all of the following:

(1) To provide those persons with informational materials relating to the university or college and its programs and activities.

(2) To provide those persons, the regents, and the alumni associations with commercial opportunities that provide a benefit to those persons, or to the regents or the alumni associations.

(3) To promote and support the educational mission of the university, the regents, or the
 alumni associations.

(b) The disclosures authorized in subdivision (a) shall be permitted only if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) (A) The regents or the alumni associations have a written agreement with a business, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.80 of the Civil Code, that maintains control over this data that requires the business to maintain the confidentiality of the names, addresses, and email addresses of the alumni, that requires that the University of California retain the right to approve or reject any purpose for which the private information is to be used by the business and to review and approve the text of mailings sent to alumni pursuant to this section, and that prohibits the business from using the information for purposes other than those described in subdivision (a). The text of a mailing intended to be sent to
 alumni pursuant to this section shall not be approved by the regents or the affected alumni association unless and until the mailing conspicuously identifies the university or the alumni association as associated with the business described in the mailing.

(B) If an affinity partner, as defined in Section 4054.6 of the Financial Code, sends any message to an email address obtained pursuant to this section, that message shall include at least both of the following:

(i) The identity of the sender of the message.

(ii) A cost-free means for the recipient to notify the sender not to electronically transmit any further message to the recipient.

(2) The regents or an alumni association shall not disclose to, or share a consumer’s nonpublic personal information
 with, a business, as defined in paragraph (1), unless the institution, association, or organization has clearly and conspicuously notified the consumer pursuant to subdivision (c), that the nonpublic personal information may be disclosed to the business and that the alumnus has not directed that the nonpublic personal information not be disclosed.

(3) The disclosure of alumni names, addresses, and email addresses does not include the names, addresses, and email addresses of alumni who, pursuant to subdivision (c) or in another manner, have directed the regents or an alumni association not to disclose their names, addresses, or email addresses.

(4) Information regarding either of the following is not disclosed:

(A) The current students of the University of California.

(B) An alumnus who, as a student of a campus of the University of California, indicated that, pursuant to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (Public Law 93-380), he or she did not wish his or her name, address, and email address to be disclosed.

(c) (1) The regents or the affected alumni association shall satisfy the notice requirements of subdivision (b) if it uses the form set forth in paragraph (2). The form set forth in this subdivision or a form that complies with subparagraphs (A) to (J), inclusive, shall be provided by the regents or the alumni association to the alumnus as required in this subdivision, and shall describe the nature of the information the alumnus would receive should the alumnus choose not to opt out, so that the alumnus may make a decision and provide direction to the regents and the alumni association regarding the
 sharing of his or her name, address, and email address:

(A) The form uses the title “IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE” and the header, if applicable, as follows: “Restrict Information Sharing With Affinity Partners.”

(B) The titles and headers in the form are clearly and conspicuously displayed, and no text in the form is smaller than 10-point type.

(C) The form may be provided as a separate document, incorporated into another communication piece intended for the target audience, or provided through a link to the form located on the Internet Web site of the regents, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization. If the form is provided through a link to an Internet Web page, it shall be accompanied by the title “IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE” and a clear and concise description of the choice that can be
 made by accessing the form. This requirement may be met by using text materially similar to the first paragraph of the form set forth in paragraph (2).

(D) The choice or choices provided in the form are stated separately, and may be selected by checking a box.

(E) The form is designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information in the document.

(F) The form presents information in clear and concise sentences, paragraphs, and sections.

(G) The form uses short explanatory sentences of an average of 15 to 20 words, or bullet lists whenever possible.

(H) The form avoids multiple negatives, legal terminology, and highly technical terminology whenever possible.

(I) The form avoids explanations that are imprecise and readily subject to different interpretations.

(J) The form is not more than one page.

(2) The form reads as follows:

IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE

You have the right to control whether we share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners (companies that we partner with to offer products or services to our alumni). Please read the following information carefully before you make your choice below:

Your Rights

You have the following rights to restrict the sharing of your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners. This form does not prohibit us from sharing
 your information when we are required to do so by law. This includes sending you information about the alumni association, the university, or other products or services.

Your Choice

Restrict Information Sharing With Affinity Partners:

Unless you say “NO,” we may share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners. Our affinity partners may send you offers to purchase various products or services that we may have agreed they can offer in partnership with us.

( ) NO, please do not share my name, address, and email address with your affinity partners.

Time Sensitive Reply

You may decide at any time that you do not want us to share your information with our partners. Your choice marked here will remain unless you state otherwise. However,
 if we do not hear from you, we may share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners.

If you decide that you do not want to receive information from our partners, you may do one of the following:

(1) Call this toll-free telephone number: (xxx-xxx-xxxx).

(2) Reply electronically by contacting us through the following Internet option: xxxxxxxxxxxx.com.

(3) Fill out, sign, and send back this form to us at the following address (you may want to make a copy for your records).

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Name:

Address:

Signature:

(3) (A) The regents or the affected alumni association shall not be in violation of this subdivision solely because they include in the form one or more brief examples or explanations of the purpose or purposes for which, or the context within which, names, addresses, and email addresses will be shared, as long as those examples meet the clarity and readability standards set forth in paragraph (1).

(B) (i) The solicitation to students, upon their graduation, from the regents or the alumni association, encouraging students to join the alumni association or to avail themselves of the services or benefits of the association, shall include the form.

(ii) The alumni association magazine or newsletter, or both, shall
 include the form on an annual or more frequent basis.

(iii) The Internet Web site for the alumni association shall include a link to the form, which shall be located on either the homepage of the association’s Internet Web site or in the association’s privacy policy.

(iv) A one-time mailing to all alumni on the university or college mailing list as of January 1, 2006, shall include the form.

(v) An annual electronic communication to those alumni for whom electronic mail addresses are available, shall include the form.

(4) The regents or the affected alumni associations shall provide at least two alternative cost-free means for alumni to communicate their privacy choice, such as calling a toll-free telephone number, or using electronic means. The regents
 or the alumni association shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in the form required by this subdivision the information necessary to direct the alumnus on how to communicate his or her choices, including the toll-free telephone or facsimile number or Internet Web site address that may be used, if those means of communication are offered.

(5) (A) An alumnus may direct at any time that his or her name, address, and email address not be disclosed. The regents or the affected alumni association shall comply with the direction of an alumnus concerning the sharing of his or her name, address, and email address within 45 days of receipt by the regents or the alumni association. When an alumnus directs that his or her name, address, or email address not be disclosed, that direction is in effect until otherwise stated by the alumnus.

(B) This subdivision does not
 prohibit the disclosure of the name, address, or email address of an alumnus as allowed by other applicable state laws.

(6) The regents or the affected alumni association may provide a joint notice from the regents or from one or more alumni associations, as identified in the notice, so long as the notice is accurate with respect to the regents and the alumni association or associations participating in the joint notice.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize the release of any social security numbers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 79.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

92630.5.

This article shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the regents act, by resolution, to make it applicable. This article shall apply to the college named in Section 92200 only to the extent that the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200 acts, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 27.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Accommodation of Religious Creed [92640. - 92640.]

92640.

The Regents of the University of California shall develop policies and procedures to ensure that each campus of the university, in administering any test or examination, permits any student who is eligible to undergo the test or examination to do so, without penalty, at a time when that activity would not violate the student’s religious creed. This requirement shall not apply in the event that administering the test or examination at an alternate time would impose an undue hardship that could not reasonably have been avoided. In any court proceeding in which the existence of an undue hardship that could not reasonably have been avoided is an issue, the burden of proof shall be upon the institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Baccalaureate and Master’s Degree Nursing Programs [92645. - 92645.]

92645.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following occur:

(a) That, pursuant to funding to be appropriated in the Budget Act of 2007, the Regents of the University of California should offer at least 175 full-time equivalent students in baccalaureate degree nursing programs, at least 140 state-supported full-time equivalent students in accelerated master’s level nursing programs, including entry-level master’s programs and entry-level master’s clinical programs, at least 41 full-time equivalent associate degree nursing (ADN) transitional to bachelor’s of science of nursing (BSN) and full-time equivalent master of science of nursing (MSN) students, and at least 40 full-time equivalent students in traditional master of science in nursing (MSN) degree programs by the 2007–08 academic year.

(b) That the regents provide a report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before March 15, 2007, on the proposed expenditure plans to expand nursing programs to enroll the additional students identified in subdivision (a).

(c) That the expansion of future baccalaureate, accelerated master’s degree, ADN transitional to BSN and MSN degrees, and traditional MSN degree nursing enrollment be supported with appropriations in the annual Budget Act.

(d) That the funding for the baccalaureate degree enrollment expansions referenced in this section be funded within the general enrollment growth funding that is traditionally provided to the University of California during the annual state budget process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 522, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Health Sciences Program Review [92650. - 92650.]

92650.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to review, during the annual budget process, the current University of California health sciences program and to assess the following with regard to General Fund support of the system:

(1) The appropriate number and balance between primary and nonprimary care residency positions.

(2) The relationship between the General Fund resource capacity to support the current physician output of the system and the costs to the General Fund of an oversupply of physician specialists.

(3) The current and projected pattern of health manpower training in relationship to future supply and demand projections.

(4) The distribution of University of California medical school graduates with regard to placement in areas, and service to populations, underserved by the medical profession.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to monitor the new, comprehensive plan currently under development by the University of California for programs in health professions education, and, upon the completion of that plan, to monitor, during the annual budget process, both the compliance of the university with its plan and the plan’s relevance to the state’s need for health professionals and health care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1509, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.3. Health Professions Education and Outreach [92655.1. - 92655.1.]

92655.1.

The Legislature requests the Regents of the University of California, to the extent possible, to use existing resources to establish dental, medical, and optometric health professions outreach and exposure programs for elementary, high school, and undergraduate students, including community college students.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 92665.1 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.4. Animal Shelter Assistance Act [92657. - 92658.]

92657.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In 1998, the State of California enacted Senate Bill 1785 (Chapter 752 of the Statutes of 1998) to create new minimum standards for California animal shelters and establish the state’s policy that no adoptable or treatable animal should be euthanized.

(b) Since 1998, many California communities have made meaningful strides to reduce the deaths of homeless animals. Public and private sources have funded more low-cost programs for dog and cat spaying and neutering. Animal shelters have sought to modernize their facilities and practices to keep animals healthier during their time at the shelter. Public education campaigns have promoted the
 importance of adopting pets, and a growing number of private rescue groups have been formed, increasing the degree to which they assist shelters in finding new homes for animals.

(c) Although the number of deaths in California’s animal shelters fell from more than 500,000 in 1998 to an estimated 180,000 in 2018, the state’s longstanding policy goal has not yet been achieved in every community.

(d) The University of California houses the nation’s premier animal sheltering research, service, and teaching program. The shelter medicine program at the University of California, Davis promotes a welfare-centric, life-saving approach to the management of animals in shelters, focused on prevention and grounded in science. The program has been working with shelters across California since its inception, providing advice covering facility design, shelter management, animal husbandry, and
 myriad veterinary health issues that are unique to sheltering environments.

(e) With an intentional focus on and partnership with communities around California, the state will be well positioned to achieve the state’s policy goal that no adoptable or treatable animal should be euthanized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 67.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

92658.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a five-year program, which shall be known as the Animal Shelter Assistance Program, be established to support the state’s policy goal that no adoptable or treatable animal is euthanized, and that the program be administered by the University of California pursuant to all of the following principles:

(1) The program shall provide support to all California animal shelters in the form of outreach, regional conferences, and provision of web-based resources based on current best practices. Best practices may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Reducing intake by providing other solutions to keep animals safe and
 healthy in their homes, which may include spay or neuter as part of that approach, as well as vaccination, microchipping, and setting up technology and communication to help pet owners rehome their own pets instead of taking them to a shelter.

(B) Improving animal health and care in the shelter, which may include adequate housing, good ventilation, appropriate treatment and isolation facilities as well as good husbandry practices to help animals stay healthy, lower costs, and increase adoptions.

(C) Removing barriers to live outcomes, which may include technology, staffing and capacity solutions, and expanding spay or neuter capacity to keep up with outflow. This may also include systems to reunite lost pets and developing an adoption presence in the community.

(2) The program shall offer in-person assessments and
 in-depth online training to California city, county, or city and county animal control agencies or shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and humane societies, upon request and as feasible.

(3) As a supplement to its outreach and programmatic support, the program shall administer a grant program to aid implementation of best practices in California animal shelters. All funds shall be awarded on the basis of need as determined by an open, competitive process that ensures objectivity, fairness, and sustainability. All California city, county, or city and county animal control agencies or shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and humane societies shall have access and opportunity to voluntarily compete for the funds. The program shall do all of the following:

(A) Develop criteria, procedures, and accountability measures as may be
 necessary to implement the grant program.

(B) Administer the grant program to ensure that priority is given to underserved populations, including both urban and rural areas and low-income communities, where achievement of the state’s goal that no adoptable or treatable animal is euthanized has not yet been met.

(C) In developing criteria, procedures, and accountability measures, include a focus on preventing pet overpopulation, such as measures to offer no or low cost spay or neuter services.

(4) For purposes of this section, a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals or a humane society shall be a California corporation, duly incorporated in the State of California, in active status, as described on the business search page of the Secretary of State’s internet website, and exempt from federal income taxation
 as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) For purposes of this section, the program is encouraged to prioritize assistance for California city, county, or city and county animal control agencies or shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and humane societies that are current on relevant data reporting required under law, and that offer the greatest likely return on one-time investment of state funds.

(b) In designing and promoting the services outlined in subdivision (a), the program shall seek input from relevant stakeholders to ensure that program services and grants effectively reach a wide geography throughout the state, and that regions in northern, central, and southern California, including both urban and rural areas, are adequately considered, with an emphasis on addressing the lifesaving needs within these
 regions.

(c) The program may give additional consideration to working with communities that do any of the following:

(1) Seek to maximize the number of animals whose lives can be saved.

(2) Demonstrate partnerships among public, private, corporate, or nonprofit entities.

(3) Emphasize volunteer engagement and community outreach components for purposes of increasing the sustainability of the program’s investments.

(d) (1) On or before March 31, 2023, the University of California shall report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance on the program. At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following
 information:

(A) The amount spent on each type of activity set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(B) Pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a summary of the outreach activities that were supported by funds.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a list of shelters that received in-person assessments and in-depth training.

(D) Pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a list of grant recipients, along with each recipient’s grant amount, the amount of matching funds, if any, and a description of the funded activities.

(E) An analysis of the program’s impact on the number of animals that are euthanized for all shelters participating in the
 activities described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a). The analysis shall include annual data on the number of animals that were euthanized at least five years preceding the establishment of the program and throughout the duration of the program. To the extent possible, the analysis shall use the best available data to estimate the number of treatable and adoptable animals that are euthanized in the state. The University of California, Davis Koret Shelter Medicine program may require any data from program participants as needed to complete this analysis.

(F) A long-term plan to sustain any improvements in euthanized rates once the one-time funding expires and continue progressing toward the state’s policy objective that no adoptable or treatable animal be euthanized.

(G) Financial information on the University of California, Davis Koret Shelter Medicine program,
 including funding by source, spending by program and function, and end-of-year fund balances. The report shall include this information for the 2018–19 through 2023–24 fiscal years.

(2) On or before March 31, 2026, the University of California shall submit a second report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance on the program. At a minimum, the report shall include all of the information described in paragraph (1).

(e) Subject to the conditions and requirements established elsewhere in statute, the State Department of Public Health and the Department of Food and Agriculture shall provide to the program, upon proper request, data that will help ensure effective administration of the program.

(f) Toward these ends, the Legislature requests the Regents of the
 University of California to establish the Animal Shelter Assistance Program and direct the University of California, Davis Koret Shelter Medicine Program to administer the program pursuant to, and consistent with, the principles and goals stated in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 67.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Housing [92660. - 92660.]

92660.

(a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at campuses of the University of California have stable housing, each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities shall give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the University of California that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, shall first give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities for which they are eligible that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to current and former
 homeless youth and current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current or former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities for which they are eligible that are open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.

(b) In addition, a campus of the University of California is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.

(c) As used in this section, a “homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months
 immediately preceding the receipt of his or her application for admission by a campus of the University of California, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:

(1) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The director, or his or her designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.

(3) A financial aid administrator.

(d) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (c) shall retain that status
 for a period of six years from the date of admission.

(e) This section shall not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make this section applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 571, Sec. 4.   (AB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.7. Support Services for Foster Youth Attending the University of California [92663. - 92663.]

92663.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the office of the President of the University of California shall provide each participating campus with funding to support postsecondary education programs for foster youth and former foster youth. The office of the President of the University of California shall develop a funding formula that allocates funding to each campus that offers a foster youth support program. The formula may authorize each participating campus to maintain a minimum baseline funding amount. The formula shall be based on the number of students participating in the program at each participating campus.

(b) Funding allocated to each campus pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used to
 provide support services to students who are foster youth and former foster youth, which may include, but are not limited to, outreach and recruitment, consultation and eligibility verification, consultation and referrals for students deemed ineligible, service coordination, counseling and academic advising, grants for books, supplies, tutoring, childcare, housing, or transportation, independent living and financial literacy skills support, frequent in-person contact, career guidance, referrals to health services, mental health services, housing assistance, and other related services, and direct financial support.

(c) A campus program may provide all the services described in subdivision (b) to enrolled students who are foster youth or former foster youth but whose courses have not yet commenced, if those services are necessary to enable the student to be successful upon the commencement of the academic term. Funding may also be used to support
 these services during the summer term for students enrolled in the upcoming fall term.

(d) Each participating campus shall offer all of the following as part of its program provided pursuant to this section:

(1) A full-time designated staff program director or coordinator with experience relevant to working with foster youth and former foster youth.

(2) Campus office and meeting space.

(3) A range of student supports to address academic and nonacademic needs.

(4) Opportunities for peer mentors.

(e) To the extent possible, services provided under this section, including those required pursuant to subdivision (d), shall
 supplement, and shall not supplant, other services provided by the state, a county, or a campus. Where existing targeted programs for foster youth and former foster youth exist on campus, funding shall be used to continue and expand these programs.

(f) Commencing March 31, 2024, and every two years thereafter, the office of the President of the University of California shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee describing all of the following:

(1) Efforts during the previous academic year to serve students who are foster youth and former foster youth, including uses of the funding allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) and uses of other internal and external resources supporting foster youth services.

(2) Enrollment, retention, and completion rate data for students
 who are foster youth and former foster youth and participated in programs funded pursuant to this section on a campus-by-campus basis, and other metrics as appropriate.

(3) As feasible, systemwide data on enrollment, retention, and completion rates for students who are foster youth and former foster youth and participated in programs funded pursuant to this section, and other metrics as appropriate, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 45.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. The University of California and California State University Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning [92665. - 92669.]

92665.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the University of California and California State University Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning.

(b) The goal of this article is to establish a joint University of California and California State University initiative that will bring together the state’s resources and leading experts in brain research and K–12 education to strengthen educational support and new teaching methods for children with diverse learning needs, including children with dyslexia and literacy issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 27.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92666.
